Missouri, session 2026, HB3199.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
D
Section A. Chapter 311, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 311.083, to read as follows:
311.083. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
H
(1) "Common area", any public area within an entertainment district and any
area of a public right-of-way that is within the entertainment district. "Common area"
shall not incluTde areas open to the public that are located within an establishment
licensed under this chapter;
(2)I"Entertainment district", any area in any county that borders on or that
contains part of a lake with not less than one thousand miles of shoreline and that:
W
(a) Is located in any city with more than four thousand four hundred but fewer
than four thousand nine hundred inhabitants and partially located in a county with
more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants;
(b) Contains a combination of entertainment venues, bars, nightclubs,
restaurants, and other licensed establishments and common areas; and
(c) Is designated as such by an ordinance of the governing body of the city;
(3) "Portable bar", any bar, table, kiosk, cart, or stand that is not a permanent
fixture and can be moved from place to place.
2. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, any
person who possesses the qualifications required under this chapter, and who meets the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3199 2
requirements of and complies with the provisions of this chapter, may apply for, and the
supervisor of alcohol and tobacco control may issue, an entertainment district special
license to sell intoxicating liquor by the drink for retail for consumption dispensed from
one or more licensed establishments including, but not limited to, portable bars within
the entertainment district, until 1:30 a.m. on Mondays through Saturdays and from 6:00
N
a.m. on Sundays and until 1:30 a.m. on Mondays.
3. An applicant granted an entertainment district special license under this
section shall pay a license fee of three hundred dollarsW per year.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, on such
days and at such times during the hours a licensee is allowed under this chapter to sell
alcoholic beverages, licensed establishments holding an entertainment district special
A
license under this section, may allow persons to leave the licensed premises located in
portions of the entertainment district with an alcoholic beverage and enter upon and
consume the alcoholic beverage withinR other licensed establishments and common areas
located in portions of the entertainment district. No person shall take any alcoholic
beverage or alcoholic beverages outside the boundaries of the entertainment district.
D
5. Every licensee within the entertainment district shall serve alcoholic
beverages in containers that display and contain the licensee's trade name or logo or
some other mark thaHt is unique to that license and licensee.
6. The holder of an entertainment district special license is solely responsible for
alcohol violations occurring on its premises, including any portable bar, and in any
T
common area.
7. The governing body of the city in which the entertainment district is located
shall be auIthorized to adopt by ordinance procedures for approval or rejection of such
Wentertainment districts as well as rules and regulations for conduct and enforcement
thereof consistent with this section.
✔